Ohio, session 136, HB482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.972 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.972. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes 7
of United States route number thirty between evening star avenue 8
and Neimans avenue, in Stark county, shall be known as the "Bill 9
Powell Memorial Highway." 10
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 11
along the highway indicating its name. 12